Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7789.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-19.7 of the General Laws entitled "Electric Bicycles" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following sections:
31-19.7-4. Notice of state laws, rules, and regulations.
(a) All businesses that sell electric bicycles in Rhode Island shall prominently display
provisions and restrictions imposed by state law regulating electric bicycles.
(b) The office of energy resources shall notify electric bicycle rebate recipients of
applicable state laws regarding electric bicycles, including, but not limited to, the provisions of this
chapter and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
31-19.7-5. Age restriction.
Any "electric motorized bicycle", also called an "electric bicycle", as defined in § 31-19.7-
7.1 shall not be operated on state, municipal roads, or highways in this state by a person under the
age of sixteen (16) years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003128/SUB A
========